Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,211.07
Implied consent to submit to chemical test violation; impounded license; return; prohibited act; effect.

(1) At the end of the impoundment period under section 60-6,211.02, the operator's license shall be returned by the court to the licensee.

(2) Any person who unlawfully operates a motor vehicle during the period of impoundment shall be subject to section 60-4,108.

Laws 1998, LB 309, § 23;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 56.